Utah statutes.
41-3-703.   Violations as felonies.

(1)  A person may not forge, falsify, or counterfeit any license, special plate, temporary permit, in-transit permit, decal, or other document issued by the division or any other state or jurisdiction.

(2)  A person may not hold or use any license, special plate, temporary permit, in-transit permit, decal, or other document issued by the division or any other state or jurisdiction knowing it to have been forged, falsified, or counterfeited.

(3)  A violation of Subsection (1) or (2) is a third degree felony.



Enacted by Chapter 165, 1998 General Session

